Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.46.050

Costs as charge against bank's assets.

All costs incident to supervisory direction and the conservatorship shall be fixed and determined by the director and shall be a charge against the assets of the bank, excluding trust assets under management, to be allowed and paid as the director may determine.

[ 2014 c 37 s 248; 2013 c 76 s 17; 1994 c 92 s 137; 1975 1st ex.s. c 87 s 5. Formerly RCW 30.46.050.]